Utah statutes.
41-6a-706.   Limitation on passing -- Prohibitions.
(1) Subject to the provisions of Section 41-6a-707, on a two-way highway, a
person may not operate a vehicle to the left side of the center of the roadway
to pass another vehicle proceeding in the same direction unless the left side
is:
(a)  clearly visible; and
(b)  free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance to permit the passing
movement to be completed without interfering with the operation of any vehicle
approaching from the opposite direction in accordance with Subsection (2).
(2)  The person operating the overtaking vehicle shall return the vehicle to
an authorized lane of travel:
(a)  as soon as practical; and
(b)  if the passing movement involves the use of a lane authorized for
vehicles approaching in the opposite direction, before coming within 200 feet
of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction.
